Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-576
Class I, II, III, or IV school district; secretary; duty as clerk of board.

The secretary of a Class I, II, III, or IV school district shall be clerk of the school board and of all meetings when present, but if he or she is not present, the school board may appoint a clerk for the time being, who shall certify the proceedings to the secretary to be recorded by him or her.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision IV, § 9, p. 348;

R.S.1913, § 6771;

C.S.1922, § 6312;

C.S.1929, § 79-409;

R.S.1943, § 79-409;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 95, p. 724;

Laws 1996, LB 604, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-456;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 329;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 27;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 45;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 52.

Secretary is the clerk of the district board. George v. School Dist. No. 24 of Red Willow County, 157 Neb. 791, 61 N.W.2d 401 (1953).

Under former law, action of school board on expulsion of pupil was not impaired notwithstanding director kept no formal record of meeting. Smith v. Johnson, 105 Neb. 61, 178 N.W. 835 (1920).